New Jersey, session 222, A1065.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is established, in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the Advanced Transmission Technologies Workforce Development Program, or ATT Program.  The purpose of the program is to equip electrical engineers and utility workers with skills specific to installing and managing advanced transmission technologies systems to ensure a skilled workforce that is able to support rapid and effective deployment, reducing delays related to technical capacity. b.    To achieve its goals, the department shall focus the ATT Program on developing the workforce for advanced transmission technologies systems by : (1) creating and retaining jobs and stimulating economic activity in the State; (2) embedding workforce training and employment services in infrastructure investments so that services more directly connect to the jobs created; (3) the use of community benefit agreements, community workforce agreements, and project labor agreements that connect workforce services and job training directly to jobs impacted or jobs created; (4) preparing the States students with relevant career technical education that responds to business and industry demands; (5) developing worker retraining programs to assist the existing workforce with the necessary tools to upgrade their skills; (6) responding to the job creation and workforce needs of the States new and emerging industries; and (7) identifying and leveraging State and federal funding resources to implement the recommendations made in the report required pursuant to subsection d. of this section and consistent with the regulatory purposes of this section,. c.    The department is authorized to obtain, accept and utilize resources for the ATT program as may be, or may become, available from appropriate State, federal and non-governmental sources of funding for employment, training, and educational purposes, including the Workforce Development Partnership Fund created pursuant to section 9 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-9), the "Supplemental Workforce Fund for Basic Skills" established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2001, c.152 (C.34:15D-21), or funds available pursuant to the "Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act," (29 U.S.C. s.3101 et seq.). d.    The department shall prepare and submit an annual evaluation report to the Governor and the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) on the progress of ATT Program.  The department shall prepare and submit an evaluation report to the Governor and the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), which shall include, but not be limited to, information on the effectiveness of the ATT Program, the status of ATT Program participants, and recommendations on program administration at the State and local level.  The report shall also include an analysis of the strengths and weaknesses of the ATT Program and how it can be improved in the following year. The Department shall submit the first evaluation report by July 1, 2027, and subsequent annual reports by July 1 of each year thereafter. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.